Washington statutes.
RCW 19.280.090

Combined heat and power systems—Report to the legislature.

The Washington State University extension energy program may electronically submit an annual report to the appropriate legislative committees on the planned and completed combined heat and power facilities in the state, including but not limited to the following information: Number, size, and customer base of combined heat and power installations in the state; projects that have been publicly considered but have not been developed; and recommendations to further attain the goal of improving thermal energy efficiency.

[ 2015 3rd sp.s. c 19 s 11.]

NOTES:

Finding—Intent—2015 3rd sp.s. c 19: See note following RCW 39.35.010.